Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. A professional licensing board  as defined in ORS 670.415 shall publish the
guidance described in ORS 670.415 not later than January 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. A professional licensing board as defined in ORS 670.415 shall comply  with
the requirements of ORS 670.415 not later than January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. Sections 2 and 3, chapter 618, Oregon Laws 2025, are repealed.
SECTION 4.  This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1595 (SB 1595-INTRO) Page 1